Arkansas, session 2025, HB1664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Child maltreatment investigations have at times led to
the wrongful or mistaken allegation of child maltreatment against a parent or
other caretaker when the child's symptoms that may, at first or superficial
glance, appear to be manifestations of abuse or neglect, are actually the
result of a medical condition that may or may not be known to the child's
family, including genetic conditions that the parent himself or herself may
*LJH157*
04-02-2025 10:58:22 LJH157

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1664
unknowingly have;
(2) When such a child maltreatment investigation results
in a child being removed from his or her home and placed in foster care, it
may result in varying levels of trauma to the child, his or her siblings, his
or her parent or parents, and other members of the child's family;
(3) A parent or other caretaker of a child who is
wrongfully or mistakenly alleged to have caused or contributed to the abuse
or neglect of a child who is actually presenting symptoms of a medical
condition that are not caused by abuse or neglect to the child may be
subjected to not only separation from his or her child, but also threats to
his or her liberty in the form of having a petition for dependency-neglect or
a petition for termination of parental rights filed against him or her, or
even having his or her name placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry
or a criminal prosecution against him or her when there was not in fact child
maltreatment or a criminal offense committed;
(4) These detrimental effects can cause loss of time,
money, and mental and emotional wellbeing to many persons affected by the
wrongful or mistaken allegation of child maltreatment; and
(5) Although the intent of the Child Maltreatment Act, §
12-18-101 et seq., is to protect children from maltreatment, wrongful or
mistaken allegations of child maltreatment for symptoms of a medical
condition may actually contribute to the child's suffering not only in the
form of trauma, but also in that, if a child's underlying medical condition
is overlooked or ignored, the child remains untreated for that medical
condition and the parent or caretaker deprived of otherwise discovering and
being able to provide for the proper medical care of his or her child.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly for this act to
contribute not only to the protection of a wrongfully or mistakenly accused
parent, but also the protection of the child, the family unit, and the
overall integrity of the state's child welfare, hospital, and legal systems.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 12-18-614 is amended to read as follows:
12-18-614. Submission to a physical exam or other testing.
(a) An investigation under this chapter may include a physical
examination, a drug test, radiology procedures, photographs, and a
psychological or psychiatric examination of all children subject to the care,
04-02-2025 10:58:22 LJH157

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1664
custody, or control of the alleged offender.
(b)(1) If the report of child maltreatment or suspected child
maltreatment alleges abuse as defined in §12-18-103 § 12-18-103(3), the
alleged offender may:
(A)(i) For the purpose of obtaining a second opinion,
request that the alleged victim be examined by a licensed healthcare provider
of the alleged offender's choosing who:
(a) Did not perform the initial examination,
test, or procedure described under subsection (a) of this section; and
(b) Routinely provides medical care to
pediatric patients.
(ii) An examination performed under subdivision
(b)(1)(A)(i) of this section shall:
(a) Shall be paid for by the alleged offender
or as otherwise covered by insurance or Medicaid; and
(b) May be requested by the alleged offender
regardless of whether the alleged victim has been taken into or placed in the
custody of the Department of Human Services; and
(B)(i) For the purpose of ruling out a possible
differential diagnosis, request that a licensed healthcare provider who
routinely provides medical care to pediatric patients examine the alleged
victim to determine whether or not if the alleged victim has one (1) or more
of the following medical conditions a congenital cutaneous variant, bone
fragility, a coagulation disorder, capillary fragility associated with a
genetic disorder or that may be caused by a defect in the collagen elastin
matrix, hyperextensible skin, multiple broken bones in various stages of
healing and including without limitation classic metaphyseal lesions, blue or
grey sclera, impaired bone mineralization, or another medical condition that
may appear to be caused by suspected abuse or increase the risk of
misdiagnosis of abuse as defined in § 12-18-103(3), including without
limitation:
(a) Marfan's syndrome;
(b) Hypermobility spectrum disorders;
(a)(c) Rickets;
(b)(d) Ehlers-Danlos syndrome;
(c)(e) Osteogenesis imperfecta;
04-02-2025 10:58:22 LJH157

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1664
(d)(f) Vitamin D deficiency; or
(e)(g) Another medical condition that may:
Vitamin K deficiency
(1) Appear to be caused by suspected
abuse as defined in § 12-18-103; or
(2) Increase the risk of a misdiagnosis
of abuse as defined in § 12-18-103.
(ii) An examination performed under subdivision
(b)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall be paid for by the alleged offender or as
otherwise covered by insurance or Medicaid.
(iii) If the alleged victim undergoes genetic
testing under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(i) of this section, the genetic testing
shall include a complete family medical history even if the alleged victim's
family members have not been diagnosed with a genetic condition, which shall
include the licensed healthcare provider who routinely provides medical care
to pediatric patients ascertaining if there is a family medical history of:
(a) Joint hypermobility;
(b) Sprains;
(c) Bruising;
(d) Connective tissue disorder or the physical
manifestations of a connective tissue disorder; or
(e) Fractures, including without limitation
the cause of each fracture and the age of the family member at the time of
the fracture.
(2) A licensed healthcare provider examination under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section shall not be requested for the purpose of obtaining a
second opinion on to determine whether or not if an alleged victim has been a
victim of: sexual
(A) Sexual abuse; or
(B) Physical abuse when the alleged victim is:
(i) In a critical medical condition; or
(ii) Receiving life-sustaining medical treatment.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 18, Subchapter 6, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-18-624. Right of parent, guardian, or custodian to medical records
04-02-2025 10:58:22 LJH157

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1664
of child — Definitions.
(a)(1) A court with jurisdiction may order a healthcare institution or
practitioner to provide an alleged child victim's medical records to an
alleged offender if the alleged offender:
(A) Has been accused of physical abuse; and
(B) Is a parent, putative parent, guardian, or custodian
of the alleged victim.
(2) A court with jurisdiction may enter a protective order
restricting the dissemination of the medical records or from making any use
of the medical records other than for purposes of a specific case before the
court.
(3) Medical records shall include hospital or clinic records,
physicians' records, or other healthcare records, including without
limitation:
(A) An admissions form, discharge summary, history and
physical exam records, progress notes, physicians' orders, reports of
operations, recovery room records, lab reports, consultation reports,
medication administration records, nurses' notes, and other reports
catalogued and maintained by the medical records department of a hospital,
doctor's office, medical clinic, or any other medical facility; and
(B) A paper entry, electronic entry, or image that is:
(i) Captured in relation to a diagnosis, treatment,
or other service provided to a child; or
(ii) Relied upon by a healthcare provider to
diagnose or provide treatment or other services to a child.
(4) A healthcare institution or provider shall redact the
alleged child victim's address, phone number, email address, and other
information regarding the alleged child victim's foster placement before
providing medical records under this section.
(5) A healthcare institution or provider that fails to provide
medical records under this section pursuant to a valid court order may be
held in contempt of court under § 16-10-108.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that "Quincy's Law", Acts 2021, No.
976, is a crucial protection for persons who are the subject of an
04-02-2025 10:58:22 LJH157

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1664
investigation under the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq.; that
since the enactment of Quincy's Law in 2021, an additional need for further
protections under Quincy's Law has been demonstrated, most notably to provide
further clarity in child maltreatment investigations involving differential
diagnoses that may present as possible child abuse without additional testing
that the provisions in this act make available; that this act is needed not
only to protect wrongfully accused parents, but also to assist a parent who
may not be aware of his or her child's condition and be given the opportunity
to provide his or her child necessary medical treatment; that this act is
also urgent to protect families from undergoing unnecessary trauma related to
family separation and wrongful or mistaken allegations of child maltreatment
that are actually manifestations of medical conditions; and that numerous
child maltreatment investigations are taking place at any given time, and
thus there is an urgent need for the provisions in this act to become
effective. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/K. Brown











04-02-2025 10:58:22 LJH157